District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.25

Stock book — Effect of records.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1287, ch. 854, § 629
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-201.25.
1981 Ed., § 29-225.
1973 Ed., § 29-225.